Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-960.01
Community colleges; applied research activities permitted.

Applied research activities of the community college areas shall be directly related to the enhancement of the instructional programs, student achievement, institutional effectiveness, public service activities, and the professional development of the faculty.

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 100;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 15.